Mississippi, session 2026, SB2651.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following shall be codified as Section 25-61-11.3, Mississippi Code of 1972: 25-61-11.3  Reports, surveys, schedules, lists or data compiled or collected for the purpose of identifying, evaluating or planning the safety enhancement of potential accident sites, hazardous roadway conditions or railway-highway crossings, pursuant to federal law or for the purpose of developing any highway safety construction improvement project which may be implemented utilizing Federal-aid Highway Funds shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.